Illinois, session 104th, HB3839.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 6Section 2705-618 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-618 new)8    Sec. 2705-618. Charging at rest stops. 9    (a) The Department shall install level II electric vehicle 10charging stations at each rest stop along each interstate 11highway in this State. The Department shall adopt rules to 12implement this subsection and for the purpose of limiting 13charging to a maximum of 2 hours consecutively per person, as 14verified by a driver's license or other State issued ID.15    (b) Subject to approval by the United States Secretary of 16Transportation, the Department may install direct current 17fast-charging stations at each rest stop along each interstate 18highway in this State, which charge an electric vehicle 19charging fee in an amount no greater than what is necessary to 20offset the cost to the State in constructing and maintaining 21the charging infrastructure and procuring electricity. The 22Department shall adopt rules to implement this subsection.    HB3839- 2 -LRB104 09547 LNS 19610 b1    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 2Sections 5.1030 and 6z-144 as follows: 3    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)4    Sec. 5.1030. The EV Charging Station Fund. 5    (30 ILCS 105/6z-144 new)6    Sec. 6z-144. The EV Charging Station Fund. The EV Charging 7Station Fund is created as a special fund in the State 8treasury. All money in the EV Charging Station Fund fund shall 9be used by the Department of Transportation, subject to 10appropriation, for expenses directly related to the 11installation, maintenance, procuring electricity, and other 12costs associated with electric vehicle charging stations at 13highway rest stops. 14    Section 15. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 15changing Section 3-805 as follows: 16    (625 ILCS 5/3-805)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-805)17    Sec. 3-805. Electric vehicles. 18    (a) The owner of a motor vehicle of the first division or a 19motor vehicle of the second division weighing 8,000 pounds or 20less propelled by an electric engine and not utilizing motor 21fuel may register such vehicle for a registration fee equal to 22the fee set forth in Section 3-806 for motor vehicles of the   HB3839- 3 -LRB104 09547 LNS 19610 b1first division, other than Autocycles, Motorcycles, Motor 2Driven Cycles, and Pedalcycles. In addition to the 3registration fees, the Secretary shall assess an additional 4$150 $100 per year in lieu of the payment of motor fuel taxes. 5$1 of the additional fees shall be deposited into the 6Secretary of State Special Services Fund, $50 of the 7additional fees shall be deposited into the EV Charging 8Station Fund, and the remainder of the additional fees shall 9be deposited into the Road Fund.10    (b) Beginning with the 2023 registration year, upon the 11request of the vehicle owner, an electric vehicle owner may 12register an electric vehicle with any qualifying registration 13issued under this Chapter, and an additional $100 surcharge 14shall be collected in addition to the applicable registration 15fee. The $100 additional fee is to identify the vehicle as an 16electric vehicle. The $100 additional fee is an annual, flat 17fee that shall be based on an applicant's new or existing 18registration year for the vehicle's corresponding weight 19category. A designation as an electric vehicle under this 20subsection shall not alter a vehicle's registration. Of the 21additional fees, $1 shall be deposited into the Secretary of 22State Special Services Fund, $50 of the additional fees shall 23be deposited into the EV Charging Station Fund, and the 24remainder of the additional fees shall be deposited into the 25Road Fund. The Secretary shall adopt any rules necessary to 26implement this subsection (b).   HB3839- 4 -LRB104 09547 LNS 19610 b1(Source: P.A. 101-32, eff. 6-28-19; 102-154, eff. 1-1-22.)